Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 7
PROPERTY AND EQUIPMENT

28-3-701. Misuse of property and funds by military personnel - penalty.

Any officer or enlisted person who refuses to account for and to surrender up any moneys or any uniforms or equipment or other military property for which he or she is responsible or accountable, or who appropriates the same to his or her own use, or who knowingly makes a false payroll or signs a false certificate which is the basis for the payment of moneys under this article, or who aids or abets another in any of these acts commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 625, § 52.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-52.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-52.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 881, § 56, effective July 1, 1979.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 847, § 120, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 601, § 50, effective May 24; entire section amended, p. 1541, § 282, effective October 1.

28-3-702. Misuse of property - generally - penalty.

Every person, whether a member of the military forces or not, who willfully destroys, damages, sells or disposes of, or buys or receives any arms, equipment, or accouterments issued by the United States or the state for the use of military forces or refuses to deliver or pay for the same upon lawful demand commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 625, § 53.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-53.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-53.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3245, § 492, effective March 1, 2022.

28-3-703. Property and fiscal officer - appointment - duties.

The governor, pursuant to federal authority, shall appoint, designate, or detail an officer of the National Guard who shall be regarded as property and fiscal officer for the United States. The property and fiscal officer shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The property and fiscal officer shall receipt and account for all funds and property belonging to the United States in possession of the National Guard of this state and shall make such returns and reports concerning the same as may be required by federal law and regulations. The property and fiscal officer shall render, through the United States department of defense, such accounts of federal funds entrusted to the property and fiscal officer for disbursement as may be required by the United States treasury department. Before entering upon the performance of the duties as property and fiscal officer, the property and fiscal officer shall be required to give good and sufficient bond to the United States, the amount thereof to be determined by federal laws or regulations, for the faithful performance of the duties of the office and for the safekeeping and proper disposition of federal property and funds entrusted to the property and fiscal officer's care.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 626, § 56.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-56.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-56.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 320, § 3, effective April 21.

28-3-704. Uniforms and equipment - procurement and issuance.

The National Guard shall be uniformed, armed, and equipped as provided by federal law. Such uniforms, arms, and equipment shall be procured and issued by the proper officers as the needs of the service may require and shall be accounted for as regulations may prescribe.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 626, § 57.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-57.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-57.

28-3-705. Uniforms and equipment - distribution and return.

The commanding officer of an organization receiving clothing or equipment for the use of his or her command shall distribute the same to the members of his or her command, taking receipts and requiring the return of each article at such time and place as he or she directs.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 626, § 58.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-58.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-58.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 601, § 51, effective May 24.

28-3-706. Deductions from pay - forfeitures - lost equipment.

Legal fines or forfeitures and the value of any articles of uniform, arms, or equipment, whether state or federal, issued to any officer or enlisted person which he or she fails to return on demand of proper authority and for the loss of or damage to which he or she has been held responsible by a report of survey or other proper proceeding shall be deducted from such officer's or enlisted person's pay in the manner provided for in federal or state orders or regulations. Deductions from federal pay and allowances may only be made in the manner prescribed by federal law or regulation.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 626, § 59.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-59.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-59.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 601, § 52, effective May 24.